02_Morphology/practical02.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>       ! Noun
%<sg%>      ! Singular
%<pl%>      ! Plural
%<nom%>     ! Nominative case
%<gen%>     ! Genitive case
%<poss%>    ! Possessive
%>          ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%> # ; ! "cat"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%> # ; ! "cats"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%> # ; ! "dog"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%> # ; ! "dogs"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "person"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "people"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "friend"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "friends"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "house"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "houses"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "book"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "books"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "car"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "cars"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "city"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "cities"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "tree"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "trees"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "computer"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "computers"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "child"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "children"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "river"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "rivers"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "flower"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "flowers"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "teacher"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "teachers"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "pen"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "pens"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "sun"
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "suns"
